Hawaii, session 2026, SB3329.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that public testimony submitted to the legislature and to state and county boards, including commissions and councils, is a vital component of governance and informed decision-making, allowing individuals to share their perspectives and inform public policy. The legislature further finds that advances in artificial intelligence and automated technologies have significantly increased the ability to generate large volumes of written and oral content quickly and at low cost.  Reports that seventy‑eight per cent of businesses and as many as three hundred seventy-eight million people used artificial intelligence tools in 2025 demonstrate the widespread usage of these technologies. The legislature determines that existing testimony procedures implemented by the legislature and state and county boards do not always require sufficient information to confirm that written testimony is from actual individuals.  Reasonable verification measures, along with strong privacy protections, are needed to maintain public trust. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to maintain meaningful public participation in public meetings and hearings by requiring the legislature and state and county boards to collect certain identifying information from individuals submitting written public testimony to ensure that the testimony is from actual individuals, while protecting the privacy of those who submit testimony. SECTION 2.  Chapter 92, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§92-    Written testimony; requirements; protection of personal information.  (a)  No board shall consider written testimony submitted by an individual member of the public unless the written testimony includes or is accompanied by: (1)  The testifier's full legal name; (2)  The testifier's residential address; and (3)  Any other information deemed necessary by the board for the purposes described in subsection (b). (b)  The board shall use personal information of a testifier obtained pursuant to subsection (a) solely to verify the authenticity of the testimony and communicate with the testifier, as needed. (c)  Unless authorized by the testifier, no board shall disclose any personal information obtained pursuant to subsection (a), except the name of the testifier. (d)  For the purposes of this section, "personal information" has the same meaning as defined in section 487D-1; provided that "personal information" does not include publicly available information that is lawfully made available to the general public from federal, state, or local government records." SECTION 3.  Each house of the legislature shall adopt or amend its rules to apply the provisions of section 92-   to written public testimony submitted on measures subject to a public hearing by its standing committees, including governor's messages and judicial communications pertaining to appointment of nominees subject to the advice and consent of the senate. SECTION 4.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on January 1, 2028. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________